Georgia, session 2025_26, HB716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the Georgia Student Finance Authority, is amended by adding a new subpart to
read as follows:
"Subpart 2B
20-3-367.
As used in this subpart, the term:
H. B. 716
- 1 -

LC 61 0074
(1) 'Commission' means the Georgia Student Finance Commission created by Code
Section 20-3-233.
(2) 'Eligible postsecondary institution' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 20-3-519.
(3) 'Eligible student' means a person:
(A) Whose family income is considered economically disadvantaged, based on criteria
established by the commission, or who has a financial aid gap;
(B) Who meets any academic or other standards established by the commission;
(C) Who is eligible for a scholarship or grant pursuant to Code Section 20-3-519.1; and
(D) Who has completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA).
(4) 'Financial aid gap' means the monetary amount remaining after other funding, as
determined by the commission, for the cost of attendance certified by an eligible
postsecondary institution.

20-3-368.
(a) Subject to appropriations, the commission shall establish a needs based financial aid
program to provide grants to eligible students enrolled at an eligible postsecondary
institution for the purpose of combating food insecurity among postsecondary students.
The maximum award per eligible student shall not exceed an amount equal to the highest
cost meal plan of the postsecondary institution attended by such eligible student. The
commission may provide for individualized eligibility criteria and grant amounts as
determined to be the most appropriate for the particular eligible postsecondary institution
and its student population in accordance with this subpart. The commission shall also
establish criteria necessary for eligible students to retain and continue to receive such
grants in accordance with this subpart.
(b) Each eligible student wishing to receive a grant pursuant to this subpart shall submit
a grant application in accordance with the rules, regulations, and procedures prescribed by
H. B. 716
- 2 -

LC 61 0074
the commission. The commission is authorized to define such terms and prescribe such
rules, regulations, and procedures as may be reasonable and necessary to carry out the
purposes of this subpart. In the event a student on whose behalf a grant is paid does not
enroll as a full-time or part-time student for the academic semester for which the grant is
paid, the qualified institution shall make a refund to the commission in accordance with the
rules and regulations of the commission."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 716
- 3 -